Nevada, session 83, SB127.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 450B.160 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
450B.160 1. The health authority may issue licenses to
attendants and to firefighters employed by or serving as volunteers
with a fire-fighting agency.
2. Each license must be evidenced by a card issued to the
holder of the license, is valid for a period not to exceed 2 years and
is renewable.
3. An applicant for a license must file with the health authority:
(a) A current, valid certificate evidencing the applicant’s
successful completion of a program of training as an emergency
medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician or
paramedic, if the applicant is applying for a license as an attendant,
or, if a volunteer attendant, at a level of skill determined by the
board.
(b) A current valid certificate evidencing the applicant’s
successful completion of a program of training as an emergency
medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician or
paramedic, if the applicant is applying for a license as a firefighter
with a fire-fighting agency.
(c) A signed statement showing:
(1) The name and address of the applicant;
(2) The name and address of the employer of the applicant;
and
(3) A description of the applicant’s duties.
(d) Proof that the applicant has completed the training required
by subsection 4.
(e) Such other certificates for training and such other items as
the board may specify.
4. In addition to the training required by subsection 3, each
applicant for [a] :
(a) A license must complete [training] :
(1) Training concerning identifying and interacting with
persons with developmental disabilities [.] ; and
(2) At least 1 hour of human trafficking awareness
training, which may be conducted in person or online, and must
include, without limitation:
(I) Training concerning identifying and interacting with
victims of human trafficking in a manner that ensures the safety
of the victim and licensee; and
(II) Protocols for reporting human trafficking.
-
*SB127*

– 3 –
(b) The renewal of a license must complete the training
required by subparagraph (2) of paragraph (a) annually during
each renewal period after licensure.
5. The board shall adopt such regulations as it determines are
necessary for the issuance, suspension, revocation and renewal of
licenses.
6. Each operator of an ambulance or air ambulance and each
fire-fighting agency shall annually file with the health authority a
complete list of the licensed persons in its service.
7. Licensed physicians, registered nurses and licensed
physician assistants may serve as attendants without being licensed
under the provisions of this section. A registered nurse who
performs emergency care in an ambulance or air ambulance shall
perform the care in accordance with the regulations of the State
Board of Nursing. A licensed physician assistant who performs
emergency care in an ambulance or air ambulance shall perform the
care in accordance with the regulations of the Board of Medical
Examiners.
8. Each licensed physician, registered nurse and licensed
physician assistant who serves as an attendant must have current
certification of completion of training in:
(a) Advanced life-support procedures for patients who require
cardiac care;
(b) Life-support procedures for pediatric patients who require
cardiac care; and
(c) Life-support procedures for patients with trauma that are
administered before the arrival of those patients at a hospital.
 The certification must be issued by the Board of Medical
Examiners for a physician or licensed physician assistant or by the
State Board of Nursing for a registered nurse.
9. The Board of Medical Examiners and the State Board of
Nursing shall issue a certificate pursuant to subsection 8 if the
licensed physician, licensed physician assistant or registered nurse
attends:
(a) A course offered by a national organization which is
nationally recognized for issuing such certification;
(b) Training conducted by the operator of an ambulance or air
ambulance; or
(c) Any other course or training,
 approved by the Board of Medical Examiners or the State Board
of Nursing, whichever is issuing the certification.
10. As used in this section, “developmental disability” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 435.007.
-
*SB127*

– 4 –
Sec. 2. NRS 450B.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.180 1. Any person desiring certification as an
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic must apply to the health authority using
forms prescribed by the health authority.
2. The health authority, pursuant to regulations and procedures
adopted by the board, shall make a determination of the applicant’s
qualifications to be certified as an emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic and shall
issue the appropriate certificate to each qualified applicant.
3. A certificate is valid for a period not exceeding 2 years and
may be renewed if the holder of the certificate complies with the
provisions of this chapter and meets the qualifications set forth in
the regulations and standards established by the board pursuant to
this chapter. The regulations and standards established by the board
must provide for the completion of:
(a) A course of instruction, within 2 years after initial
certification, relating to the medical consequences of an act of
terrorism that involves the use of a weapon of mass destruction. The
course must provide at least 4 hours of instruction that includes
instruction in the following subjects:
(1) An overview of acts of terrorism and weapons of mass
destruction;
(2) Personal protective equipment required for acts of
terrorism;
(3) Common symptoms and methods of treatment associated
with exposure to, or injuries caused by, chemical, biological,
radioactive and nuclear agents;
(4) Syndromic surveillance and reporting procedures for acts
of terrorism that involve biological agents; and
(5) An overview of the information available on, and the use
of, the Health Alert Network.
 The board may thereafter determine whether to establish
regulations and standards requiring additional courses of instruction
relating to the medical consequences of an act of terrorism that
involves the use of a weapon of mass destruction.
(b) Training before initial certification concerning identifying
and interacting with persons with developmental disabilities.
(c) At least 1 hour of human trafficking awareness training
before initial certification and each year thereafter, which may be
conducted in person or online, and must include, without
limitation:
(1) Training concerning identifying and interacting with
victims of human trafficking in a manner that ensures the safety
of the victim and the holder of a certificate; and
-
*SB127*

– 5 –
(2) Protocols for reporting human trafficking.
4. Training completed pursuant to [this] paragraph (b) or (c) of
subsection 3 also satisfies the requirement for such training
prescribed by NRS 289.605 or 450B.160, if applicable.
[4.] 5. The health authority may suspend or revoke a certificate
if it finds that the holder of the certificate no longer meets the
prescribed qualifications. Unless the certificate is suspended by the
district court pursuant to NRS 425.540, the holder of the certificate
may appeal the suspension or revocation of his or her certificate
pursuant to regulations adopted by the board.
[5.] 6. The board shall determine the procedures and techniques
which may be performed by an emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic.
[6.] 7. A certificate issued pursuant to this section is valid
throughout the State, whether issued by the Division or a district
board of health.
[7.] 8. The Division shall maintain a central registry of all
certificates issued pursuant to this section, whether issued by the
Division or a district board of health.
[8.] 9. The board shall adopt such regulations as are necessary
to carry out the provisions of this section.
[9.] 10. As used in this section:
(a) “Act of terrorism” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4415.
(b) “Biological agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.442.
(c) “Chemical agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4425.
(d) “Developmental disability” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 435.007.
(e) “Radioactive agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4437.
(f) “Weapon of mass destruction” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 202.4445.
Sec. 3. NRS 289.650 is hereby amended to read as follows:
289.650 1. The Commission shall:
(a) Establish by regulation the minimum standards of a
voluntary program for the training of law enforcement dispatchers.
Such standards must include [training] :
(1) Training relating to behavioral health crisis intervention
as described in NRS 289.510 [.] ; and
(2) Human trafficking awareness training as described in
NRS 450B.160 and 450B.180.
-
*SB127*

– 6 –
(b) Certify qualified instructors for approved courses of training
for law enforcement dispatchers and issue appropriate certificates to
instructors who become certified.
(c) Issue appropriate certificates to law enforcement dispatchers
who have satisfactorily completed the voluntary program.
2. As used in this section, “law enforcement dispatcher” means
a person who is employed by a law enforcement agency or regional
telecommunication center and who promotes public safety by:
(a) Receiving calls for service related to crimes, traffic incidents,
public safety and any other related calls for assistance; and
(b) Providing immediate and critical communication between
the public and law enforcement agencies.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB127*